apertium-tat.tat.twol
"E Vowel Harmony"
%{E%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :AmbigVow* :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
            except
                                                                  [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: ?* _ ;
                                               :BackVow [ ? - [ :FrontVow | %{ь%}: | ь: ] ]* _ ;
                                                                       [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                                         %{A%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                 [ [ е: | ә: ] [ %{ь%}: ]* ]/[ %>: | :0 | [ %>: | %{A%}: ] ] _ ;
                                                                [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
                                             [ :BackVow (й:0) :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
 .#. [ :AmbigVow [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]* _ ; ! ера
                                                                           :FrontVow я:й %>: _ [ %>: | .#. ] ; ! төя -> төйи


"Convert {E} to я after й, и and {j}"
%{E%}:я <=> [ [ :FrontVow %{j%}: ] | й: | и: ]/%>: _ ;


"Epenthetic {e} Vowel Harmony"
%{е%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
            _ %>: %{s%}: ;
            except
                _ :Cns %>: :0* :Vow ;
                _ :Cns %>: %{s%}: ;
                _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: %{s%}: ;
                _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: %{I%}: ;
                _ .#. ;
                _ %>: [ ? - %{s%}: ] ;


"Epenthetic {е} Deletion"
%{е%}:0 <=> _ :Cns %>: :0* :Vow ;               ! ур{e}н>{s}{I}{n}:урны
            _ :Cns %>: %{s%}: ;                 ! ур{e}н>{s}{I}{n}>{D}{A}н:урныннан
            _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: (%{s%}:) %{I%}: ; ! сең{е}л{е}>{I}м:сеңлем
            _ .#. ;                             ! сең{е}л{е}:сеңел
            _ %>: [ ? - %{s%}: ] ;              ! сең{е}л{е}>{G}{A}:сеңелгә
            except
                _ %>: %{s%}: ;


"Delete е before E:и"
е:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %{A%}:0 ]* %{E%}:и ;
        except
            .#. б: а: _ %>: [ %{E%}: | %{A%}: ] ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"I Vowel Harmony"
%{I%}:е <=>                                       [ :Cns ь:0 [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! повесте
        [ :FrontVow [ :Cns - [ :у | :У ] ]+ ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | ъ:0 ] ] ] _ ;
                                                                     [ й:0 | и:и ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                       [ :Cns ь: %>: :Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] _ ;
 [ [ :и | :UnambigFrontVow | :ь ] :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | % | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}:0 | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
                                            [ %{ь%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}:0 | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                                          :FrontVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ %>: %{s%}:0 _ ; ! Хәяте
                                             [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{j%}: ] ] _ ; ! ай>{s}{I}:ае!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                                                                                    ! ди{j}>{I}п:дип
                                                                                                    ! ди{j}>{I}{l}>{G}{A}н:диелгән
                                                                                  .#. :д :и %>: _ %>:* [ :ш | :л | :р | :г ] ;
 except
 .#. [ :AmbigVow [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]* _ ; ! ерсын
                       [ :BackVow (й:0) :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ [ %>: | :0 ] - [ ь: | %{ь%}: ] ] _ ; ! муены, but not җәмгыяте
                                                            [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: ?* :Cns+ _ ; ! повестеның
                                                                                 [ ъ:0 ] %>: _ ; ! шәфәгы
                                                                              %{n%}: %>: н:0 _ .#. ;
                                    [? - :д ] [ :Vow - [ :Cns | :и ] ]/[ [ :0 - й: ] | %>: ] _ ; ! avoid conflict with {I} deletion
                                                                               .#. :д :и %>: _ [ :п | :ң ] ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"Delete accusative {I} after px3"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: н:0 _ .#. ;


"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - [ :у | :У | :ү | :Ү | :и | :И | :ю | :Ю ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                                .#. :д :и %>: _ [ :п | :ң ] ;
            except
                                   %{n%}: %>: н:0 _ .#. ;
                             [ й:0 ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"Fronting of U"
! кайт>{U}:кайту
%{U%}:ү <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! бел>{U}:белү
                  [ :FrontVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! сөйлә>{U}:сөйләү
            except
                .#. [ :AmbigVow [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]+ ]/[ %>: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] [ :Cns - [ :ү | :Ү ] ]* _ ; ! еру
                                                                            [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | ъ: ] %>: ?* _ ;
                                                              :BackVow [ ? - [ :FrontVow | %{ь%}: | ь: ] ]* _ ;
                                                                                      [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
                                                                  [ :BackVow :AmbigVow :Cns+ ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; ! җыел>{U}>{s}{I}:җыелуы
                                                                                            [ й: | и: ] %>: _ ;
                                                                                            !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                                                                                            [ й: | и: ] %>: _ ; ! сөй+у:сөю, куй+у:кую, ти+ү:тию
                                                                                               :Vow е:0 %>: _ ; ! бае+у:баю
                                                                                            !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"U > в between vowels"
! сөйлә>{U}>{s}{I}н:сөйләвен
! уйна>{U}>{s}{I}н:уйнавы
! but not ту:тууы
%{U%}:в <=> [ :Vow - [ :у | :У | :ү | :Ү ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
            except
                !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                [ й: | и: ] %>: _ ; ! сөй+у:сөю, куй+у:кую, ти+ү:тию
                   :Vow е:0 %>: _ ; ! бае+у:баю
                !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"U > ю after й"
%{U%}:ю <=> [ й: | и: ] %>: _ ; ! сөй+у:сөю, куй+у:кую, ти+ү:тию
               :Vow е:0 %>: _ ; ! бае+у:баю


"word-final у or ү becomes в when a vowel-initial suffix follows and a vowel precedes"
Vu:в <=> [ :Vow - [ :у | :У | :ү | :Ү ] ]/:0 _ %>: [ :Vow | %{U%}: ]/[ :0 ] ;
         where Vu in ( у ү ) matched ;
! яу, яварга, яву
! but not суы:свы, тууы:тувы !!


"Deletion of high vowels before {U}"
Vi:0 <=> _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ;
         where Vi in ( е ы ) matched ;
! укы>{U}>{s}{I}{n}:укуы
! төзе>{U}>{s}{I}{n}:төзүе


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"Voicing of к/п"
! intervocalic:          ! before -рак/-рәк
!! китап>{c}{I}          !! кызык>рак !! кысып>рак
!! китабы                !! кызыграк  !! кысыбрак
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow _ [ %{ь%}: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | ь: | ъ: ]* %>: ( :0 ) :Vow ;
               _ %>: :р ;
               except
                         .#. х: а: _ %>: %{s%}:0* %{I%}:ы :* ; ! хакы, хакын
                   .#. х: о: к: у: _ %>: %{s%}:0* %{I%}:ы :* ; ! хокукы, хокукын
!                    %>: м: %{A%}: _ %>: ( :0 ) :Vow ; ! ашамак, килмәк, бармак, but not ашамагы, килмәген, бармагын
                   where Cx in ( п к %{K%} )
                         Cy in ( б г   г)
                         matched ;


"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | %  | :0 | :ь | :ъ ] _ ;
              [ :RusVclsCns ]/[ :0 | %  | :ь | :ъ ] _ ;
              where Cx in ( %{G%} %{D%} )
                    Cy in (   к     т   )
                    matched ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | %{j%}:0 | %{w%}:0 | ь: | ъ: | й:0 | и: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
                %{е%}: %>: _ ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!!!! possessive+case phonology !!!!


"extra n appears before locative, dative, ablative, accusative"
%{n%}:н <=> _ [ [ %{D%}: | %{G%}: ] %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
            _ %>: н: %{I%}: .#. ;
!елында, елына, елыннан, елын


"ablative D to н between nasal codas"
%{D%}:н <=> :NasalCns [ %{ь%}: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: | ъ: | ь: ]* %>:0 _ %{A%}: :н ;
!елыннан, елымнан, елыңнан


"delete accusative н after px3"
н:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"Plural alternation after nasal"
%{L%}:н <=> :NasalCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{A%}: р ;


"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"Delete й in й>е and й>я and й>ю"
й:0 <=> _ [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ]* %>: :AmbigVow/:0 ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------


"я to й before {E} and {A}"
я:й <=> _ %>: [ %{E%}:й | %{A%}: ] ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!!!! Special archiphonemes !!!!


"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;
                      %{n%}:н %>: _ %{A%}: ; ! берсенә


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!!!!!!!! To be improved !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! allow analysis of "дусы", "асы" etc      !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


"{д} surfaces before vowels"
! ал%{д%}+{D}{A}н     ал%{д%}+{I}
! ал-дан               алд-ы
%{д%}:д <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;


"{т} surfaces before vowels"
%{т%}:т <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
! ас%{т%}+{D}{A}н     ас%{т%}+{I}
! ас-тан              аст-ы


"Soft sign deletion before suffix starting with a vowel"
ь:0 <=> _ [ %{ь%}: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ]* %>: :Vow/[ :0 - %>: ] ;


"Hard sign deletion before suffix starting with a vowel"
ъ:0 <=> _ [ %{ь%}: | %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ]* %>: :Vow/[ :0 - %>: ] ;


!------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! Some exceptions

!%<pres%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRESENT ;
!%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
!%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
!%<fut2%>:%>%{j%}%{A%}ч%{A%}к V-PERS-S1 ;
